Hawaii, session 2026, SB688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that many of Hawaii's farmers and ranchers are finding difficulty in securing the financial support necessary to build a thriving, vibrant business.  Various sources of funding, including grants provided by the United States Department of Agriculture and the State, counties, and private entities, are available for farmers and ranchers.  Access to grants from the United States Department of Agriculture and other sources can increase production capacity, provide new business opportunities, and increase employment opportunities within the State's agricultural industry. The legislature further finds that farmers and ranchers applying for grants may have to complete an application process that is sometimes complex.  Without specific technical expertise in grant writing, many farmers and ranchers may be deterred from applying for those grants. Well-trained and skilled grant specialists would be able to assist farmers and ranchers in obtaining and fulfilling the requirements of grants. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish grant specialist positions within the department of agriculture to assist farmers and ranchers in applying for, obtaining, and fulfilling the requirements of grants offered by the United States Department of Agriculture, State, counties, or private entities. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE) grant specialist positions within the department of agriculture to assist farmers and ranchers in applying for, obtaining, and fulfilling the requirements of grants offered by the United States Department of Agriculture, State, counties, or private entities; provided that the grant specialist positions shall prioritize assisting farmers and ranchers who produce local food that is at least partly consumed within the State. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________